Washington statutes.
RCW 2.44.060

Death or removal of attorney—Proceedings.

When an attorney dies, or is removed, or suspended, or ceases to act as such, a party to an action for whom he or she was acting as attorney, must, at least twenty days before any further proceedings against him or her, be required by the adverse party, by written notice, to appoint another attorney, or to appear in person.

[ 2011 c 336 s 62; Code 1881 s 3285; 1863 p 405 s 11; RRS s 135.]